Utah statutes.
63C-11-316.   Contest weights and classes -- Matching contestants.
(1)  The commission shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing boxing contest weights and
classes consistent with those adopted by the Association of Boxing
Commissions.
(2)  The commission shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing contest weights and classes
for unarmed combat that is not boxing.
(3) (a)  As to any unarmed combat contest, a contestant may not fight another
contestant who is outside of the contestant's weight classification.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3)(a), the commission may permit a contestant
to fight another contestant who is outside of the contestant's weight
classification.
(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), as to any unarmed combat
contest:
(a)  a contestant who has contracted to participate in a given weight class
may not be permitted to compete if the contestant is not within that weight
class at the weigh-in; and
(b)  a contestant may have two hours to attempt to gain or lose not more than
three pounds in order to be reweighed.
(5) (a)  As to any unarmed combat contest, the commission may not allow a
contest in which the contestants are not fairly matched.
(b)  Factors in determining if contestants are fairly matched include:
(i)  the win-loss record of the contestants;
(ii)  the weight differential between the contestants;
(iii)  the caliber of opponents for each contestant;
(iv)  each contestant's number of fights; and
(v)  previous suspensions or disciplinary actions of the contestants.
